Washington statutes.
RCW 9.82.030

Misprision of treason.

Every person having knowledge of the commission of treason, who conceals the same, and does not, as soon as may be, disclose such treason to the governor or a justice of the supreme court or a judge of either the court of appeals or the superior court, shall be guilty of misprision of treason and punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years or in a county jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days.

[ 2011 c 96 s 9; 1992 c 7 s 16; 1971 c 81 s 45; 1909 c 249 s 67; RRS s 2319.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.